Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Governor-Elect

§ 7-1-101.
Office, staff, and information for governor-elect.

The governor’s office of general services shall provide a governor-elect with office space and office equipment for the period between the election and inauguration.

A special appropriation to the governor’s office of general services is hereby authorized to defray the expenses of providing necessary staff employees and for the operation of the office of a governor-elect during the period between the election and inauguration.

The state fiscal management board shall make available to a governor-elect and his designated representatives information on the following: (a) all information and reports used in the preparation of the budget report; and (b) all information and reports on projected income and revenue estimates for the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-41; Laws, 1971, ch. 449, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 161, eff from and after July 1, 1984.